debug.lexc
LEXICON UnpdOblique
[Abl_Mod][Unpd][Sg]:~f-wmeng  #; [Abl_Mod][Unpd][Pl]:~f-w/-wneng  #; [Abl_Mod][Unpd][Du]:~sf-w%:(e)gneng  #;
[Loc][Unpd][Sg]:~f-wmi        #; [Loc][Unpd][Pl]:~f-w/-wni        #; [Loc][Unpd][Du]:~sf-w%:(e)gni        #;
[Ter][Unpd][Sg]:~f-wmun       #; [Ter][Unpd][Pl]:~f-w/-wnun       #; [Ter][Unpd][Du]:~sf-w%:(e)gnun       #;
[Via][Unpd][Sg]:~f-wkun       #; [Via][Unpd][Pl]:~sf-w%:(e)tgun   #; [Via][Unpd][Du]:~sf-w%:(e)gnegun     #;
[Equ][Unpd][Sg]:~f-wtun       #; [Equ][Unpd][Pl]:~sf-w%:(e)stun   #; [Equ][Unpd][Du]:~sf-w%:(e)gestun     #;
[Rel][Unpd][Sg]:~sf-w%:(e)m   #; [Rel][Unpd][Pl]:~sf-w%:(e)t      #; [Rel][Unpd][Du]:~sf-w%:(e)k          #;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!     Derivational Morphemes Applied To Verbs / Derived Bases     !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                        !!!
!!!     VerbPostbase 1     !!!
!!!                        !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VerbIntr1
@P.VALENCE.INTR@  VerbPostbase1;

LEXICON VerbTrns1
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@  VerbPostbase1;

LEXICON VerbBase
aaghhe                	VerbIntr1; ! to move freely (as a rope being pulled, or a person's behavior); to slacken
aaghhe                	VerbTrns1; ! to move freely (as a rope being pulled, or a person's behavior); to slacken
aaghte               	VerbIntr1; ! to move a little; to budge; to change one's mind; for there to be an earthquake
aaghte               	VerbTrns1; ! to move a little; to budge; to change one's mind; for there to be an earthquake
aagte                	VerbIntr1; ! to stumble; to trip
aagte                	VerbTrns1; ! to stumble; to trip
aanestaghagh          	VerbIntr1; ! to press or squeeze out; to put or thrust out
aanestaghagh          	VerbTrns1; ! to press or squeeze out; to put or thrust out
aangwaagh             	VerbIntr1; ! to be rather big,  big enough
aangwaagh             	VerbTrns1; ! to be rather big,  big enough
aante                 	VerbIntr1; ! to to take out; to bring out; to put out; to give birth to
aante                 	VerbTrns1; ! to to take out; to bring out; to put out; to give birth to
aate                  	VerbIntr1; ! to put on (clothes); to dress
aate                  	VerbTrns1; ! to put on (clothes); to dress
aawiite               	VerbIntr1; ! to lose blood
aawiite               	VerbTrns1; ! to lose blood
agaghtiiraagh         	VerbIntr1; ! to hang; to be hanging
agaghtiiraagh         	VerbTrns1; ! to hang; to be hanging
aghaligh              	VerbIntr1; ! to treat with medicine; to medicate; to put on an amulet
aghaligh              	VerbTrns1; ! to treat with medicine; to medicate; to put on an amulet
aghiva                	VerbIntr1; ! to quarrel (of women); to bawl out (by women)
aghiva                	VerbTrns1; ! to quarrel (of women); to bawl out (by women)
aghnapesqighte        	VerbIntr1; ! to sit (in woman's traditional style)
aghnapesqighte        	VerbTrns1; ! to sit (in woman's traditional style)
aghqe                	VerbIntr1; ! to make an offering of food for the deceased
aghqe                	VerbTrns1; ! to make an offering of food for the deceased
aghquugte             	VerbIntr1; ! to be pale from illness
aghquugte             	VerbTrns1; ! to be pale from illness
aghtaghagh            	VerbIntr1; ! to become light
aghtaghagh            	VerbTrns1; ! to become light
aghula                	VerbIntr1; ! to dance Eskimo-style; to shake (as to wake up a person); to move back and forth (as of something hanging)
aghula                	VerbTrns1; ! to dance Eskimo-style; to shake (as to wake up a person); to move back and forth (as of something hanging)
aghveqi               	VerbIntr1; ! to strike a whale
aghveqi               	VerbTrns1; ! to strike a whale
aghyughsigh           	VerbIntr1; ! to age food as a means of storage and/or preparation
aghyughsigh           	VerbTrns1; ! to age food as a means of storage and/or preparation
agitagha              	VerbIntr1; ! to yawn
agitagha              	VerbTrns1; ! to yawn
agniigh               	VerbIntr1; ! to flow steadily
agniigh               	VerbTrns1; ! to flow steadily
akeqe                 	VerbIntr1; ! to promise
akeqe                 	VerbTrns1; ! to promise
akilghuu            	VerbIntr1; ! to yell; to scream; to use a loud voice
akilghuu            	VerbTrns1; ! to yell; to scream; to use a loud voice
akiqu                 	VerbIntr1; ! to sass back
akiqu                 	VerbTrns1; ! to sass back
akluma                	VerbIntr1; ! to be poor
akluma                	VerbTrns1; ! to be poor
aksig                 	VerbIntr1; ! to paddle with an oar outward from the boat so as to make it turn
aksig                 	VerbTrns1; ! to paddle with an oar outward from the boat so as to make it turn
akulpeghte            	VerbIntr1; ! to add something in the middle
akulpeghte            	VerbTrns1; ! to add something in the middle
akuuragh              	VerbIntr1; ! to be at the same place or same time
akuuragh              	VerbTrns1; ! to be at the same place or same time
akwaangigh            	VerbIntr1; ! to increase in volume or number or frequency
akwaangigh            	VerbTrns1; ! to increase in volume or number or frequency
aleghqumsug           	VerbIntr1; ! to chat; to gossip
aleghqumsug           	VerbTrns1; ! to chat; to gossip
alguma                	VerbIntr1; ! to covet something; to want more (food or the like)
aliftugh              	VerbTrns1; ! to miscarry
alignagh              	VerbIntr1; ! to have shamanistic power; to be a shaman
aliighagh             	VerbTrns1; ! to keep one's hands inside his parka sleeves
alingengite           	VerbIntr1; ! to be fearless
alinge                	VerbTrns1; ! to be afraid; be scared
allake                	VerbIntr1; ! to find (it) different or unfamiliar
allakunginagh         	VerbTrns1; ! to get confused; to go haywire
allngugh              	VerbIntr1; ! to submerge; to dive under water
allughqi              	VerbTrns1; ! to adopt (a child)
amaghagh              	VerbIntr1; ! to continue to carry on one's shoulders
amaghte               	VerbTrns1; ! to criss-cross
amqeghqugh            	VerbIntr1; ! to bite repeatedly
amqeghte              	VerbTrns1; ! to bite
amyume                	VerbIntr1; ! to waste or squander
amyuqetagh            	VerbTrns1; ! to be cruel
aneghneghiite         	VerbIntr1; ! to get out of breath
aneghneghte           	VerbTrns1; ! to do something that turns out well; to choose well
angegh                	VerbIntr1; ! to affirm; to assent; to agree; to say "yes"
anghungite            	VerbTrns1; ! to eat greedily; to gobble food; to use things up fast
anglii                	VerbIntr1; ! to make a hole for ice-fishing
anglime               	VerbTrns1; ! to be spectacular; to be resounding
angu                  	VerbIntr1; ! to overtake; to catch up with
anguyiqe              	VerbTrns1; ! to pick a fight
anighte               	VerbIntr1; ! to make up one's mind; to stay a certain way; to be determined
anigusiigh            	VerbTrns1; ! to cut blocks of snow for melting into water
apallengya            	VerbIntr1; ! to cry and fuss without reason (of children)
apapaagh              	VerbTrns1; ! to give food in honor of a new baby (given by baby's parents going house to house)
apunaqaqe             	VerbIntr1; ! to request permission to be absent
aputite               	VerbTrns1; ! to give harvested or hunted item to (someone met near site)
aqfate                	VerbIntr1; ! to fetch something; to go get something
aqfayngwaag           	VerbTrns1; ! to trot; to gallop or run fast (of reindeer, bear, etc.)
aqnigh                	VerbIntr1; ! to be in pain
aqniilngagh           	VerbTrns1; ! to endure pain; to cause pain
aqupileghyug          	VerbIntr1; ! to feel obligated to help
aqupilqe              	VerbTrns1; ! to come to someone's aid; to help
ataasiighmete         	VerbIntr1; ! to be single-minded
ataasiighte           	VerbTrns1; ! to become, or cause to become, one; to make up one's mind
atigh                	VerbIntr1; ! to say
atiiqe                	VerbIntr1; ! to name someone after
atipallagh            	VerbTrns1; ! to single out; to shade in; to emphasize
avelemki             	VerbIntr1; ! to become unconscious
avelemki             	VerbTrns1; ! to rush; to bustle about
avuughagh               VerbIntr1; ! to sort quickly; to divide quickly
avugh                 	VerbTrns1; ! to sort; to sort out and set aside
ayaa                  	VerbIntr1; ! to become blind
ayagaghte             	VerbTrns1; ! to suddenly push off
ayemqe                	VerbIntr1; ! to break long thin object to pieces
ayemqugh              	VerbTrns1; ! to break long thin object to pieces
ayuqesighagh          	VerbIntr1; ! to mimic
ayuqe                 	VerbTrns1; ! to be a certain way; to resemble; to be like 
ghhuute[Imprs_Agnt]:ghhuute              VerbIntr1; ! to be cold (person)
lliigh[Imprs_Agnt]:lliigh                VerbTrns1; ! to become a certain way
piyug        UnpdOblique;
pinigh       UnpdOblique;
neghenghite  UnpdOblique;
aqlaghaghte  UnpdOblique;
